North Carolina, session 2025, HB790.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Article 52 of Chapter 14 of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"§ 14-401.28. Sale of tobacco products, alternative nicotine products, and vapor products
near schools unlawful.
(a) It is unlawful for any person, firm, or corporation in this State to sell or to purchase
any tobacco products, alternative nicotine products, or vapor products at any of the following:
(1) Any location which is within 1,000 feet of any property line of a property on
which any public or nonpublic school is located.
(2) Within any structure, any portion of which is within 1,000 feet of any property
line of a property on which any public or nonpublic school is located.
(b) As used in this section, the terms "tobacco products," "alternative nicotine products,"
and "vapor products" have the same meaning as defined in G.S. 14-313. As used in this section,
"school" does not include home schools as defined in G.S. 115C-563 or institutions of higher
education.
(c) It shall not be a violation of this section to sell or purchase tobacco products,
alternative nicotine products, or vapor products in a location prohibited by subsection (a) of this
section if the sale or purchase of tobacco products, alternative nicotine products, or vapor
products is incidental to the primary operations of an established business facility.
(d) A violation of this section is a Class 2 misdemeanor."
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective December 1, 2025, and applies to offenses
committed on or after that date.
*H790-v-1*